Utah statutes.
70A-3-501.   Presentment.
(1)  "Presentment" means a demand made by or on behalf of a person entitled to
enforce an instrument to pay the instrument made to the drawee or a party
obliged to pay the instrument or, in the case of a note or accepted draft
payable at a bank, to the bank, or to accept a draft made to the drawee.
(2)  The following rules are subject to Title 70A, Chapter 4, Uniform
Commercial Code -- Bank Deposits and Collections agreement of the parties,
clearinghouse rules, and the like:
(a)  Presentment:
(i)  may be made at the place of payment of the instrument and must be made at
the place of payment if the instrument is payable at a bank in the United
States;
(ii)  may be made by any commercially reasonable means, including an oral,
written, or electronic communication;
(iii)  is effective when the demand for payment or acceptance is received by
the person to whom presentment is made; and
(iv)  is effective if made to any one of two or more makers, acceptors,
drawees, or other payors.
(b)  Upon demand of the person to whom presentment is made, the person making
presentment must:
(i)  exhibit the instrument;
(ii)  give reasonable identification and, if presentment is made on behalf of
another person, reasonable evidence of authority to do so; and
(iii)  sign a receipt on the instrument for any payment made or surrender the
instrument if full payment is made.
(c)  Without dishonoring the instrument, the party to whom presentment is made
may:
(i)  return the instrument for lack of a necessary indorsement; or
(ii)  refuse payment or acceptance for failure of the presentment to comply
with the terms of the instrument, an agreement of the parties, or other
applicable law or rule.
(d)  The party to whom presentment is made may treat presentment as occurring
on the next business day after the day of presentment if the party to whom
presentment is made has established a cut-off hour not earlier than 2 p.m.
for the receipt and processing of instruments presented for payment or
acceptance and presentment is made after the cut-off hour.
